tools/snowball/algorithms/swedish.sbl
// Swedish stemmer, from the Snowball project: https://snowballstem.org/algorithms/swedish/stemmer.html
// This is swedish.sbl of Snowball 2.2.0 as it was published.
// Snowball is BSD licensed, see tools/snowball/LICENSE-SNOWBALL.
// Regenerate the stemmers with: pnpm stemmers

routines (
           mark_regions
           main_suffix
           consonant_pair
           other_suffix
)

externals ( stem )

integers ( p1 x )

groupings ( v s_ending )

stringescapes {}

/* special characters */

stringdef a"   '{U+00E4}'
stringdef ao   '{U+00E5}'
stringdef o"   '{U+00F6}'

define v 'aeiouy{a"}{ao}{o"}'

define s_ending  'bcdfghjklmnoprtvy'

define mark_regions as (

    $p1 = limit
    test ( hop 3 setmark x )
    goto v gopast non-v  setmark p1
    try ( $p1 < x  $p1 = x )
)

backwardmode (

    define main_suffix as (
        setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring])
        among(

            'a' 'arna' 'erna' 'heterna' 'orna' 'ad' 'e' 'ade' 'ande' 'arne'
            'are' 'aste' 'en' 'anden' 'aren' 'heten' 'ern' 'ar' 'er' 'heter'
            'or' 'as' 'arnas' 'ernas' 'ornas' 'es' 'ades' 'andes' 'ens' 'arens'
            'hetens' 'erns' 'at' 'andet' 'het' 'ast'
                (delete)
            's'
                (s_ending delete)
        )
    )

    define consonant_pair as setlimit tomark p1 for (
        among('dd' 'gd' 'nn' 'dt' 'gt' 'kt' 'tt')
        and ([next] delete)
    )

    define other_suffix as setlimit tomark p1 for (
        [substring] among(
            'lig' 'ig' 'els' (delete)
            'l{o"}st'        (<-'l{o"}s')
            'fullt'          (<-'full')
        )
    )
)

define stem as (

    do mark_regions
    backwards (
        do main_suffix
        do consonant_pair
        do other_suffix
    )
)
